New York, session 2025-2026, A6459.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 353-a of the agriculture and 2 markets law, as added by chapter 118 of the laws of 1999, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 1. A person is guilty of aggravated cruelty to animals when[,]: (a) 5 with no justifiable purpose, [he or she] such person intentionally kills 6 or intentionally causes serious physical injury to a companion animal 7 with aggravated cruelty or (b) under circumstances evincing a depraved 8 indifference to the life of an animal, such person recklessly engages in 9 conduct which creates a grave risk of serious physical injury or death 10 to the animal, and thereby causes serious physical injury or death to 11 such animal. For purposes of this section, "aggravated cruelty" shall 12 mean conduct which: (i) is intended to cause extreme physical pain; or 13 (ii) is done or carried out in an especially depraved or sadistic 14 manner. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07513-01-5